Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.161

Manager—Member's rights and duties.

A person who is both a manager and a member has the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a manager and also has the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a member to the extent of such person's participation in the limited liability company as a member.

[ 2015 c 188 s 34.]